District of Columbia statutes.
16-1108

Recovery of less than is claimed.

The plaintiff, under a claim to certain described premises, may recover less than the whole property claimed, and, under a claim to an entire property, may recover an undivided part thereof.

History

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 565, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 16-1108.
1973 Ed., § 16-1108.